Arkansas, session 2025, HB1467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-55-102, concerning the definitions used
under the Uniform Money Services Act, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(24) "Elder adult" means a person who is sixty years of age or
older.
(25) "Existing customer" means a consumer who:
(A) is engaging in a transaction at a virtual currency
kiosk in the state; and
(B) has been registered for more than seventy-two hours as
a customer of the:
(i) owner of the virtual currency kiosk; or
(ii) virtual currency kiosk operator.
(26)(A) "Money transmission kiosk" or “virtual currency kiosk”
means an automated, unstaffed electronic machine that allows users to engage
in money transmission, including any machine that is capable of accepting or
dispensing cash in exchange for virtual currency.
(B) "Money transmission kiosk" or "virtual currency kiosk"
does not include consumer cellular telephones and other similar personal
devices.
*ANS122*
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(27) "New customer" means a consumer who:
(A) is engaging in a transaction at a virtual currency
kiosk in this state; and
(B) has been registered for less than seventy-two hours as
a customer of the:
(i) owner of the virtual currency kiosk; or
(ii) virtual currency kiosk operator.
(28) "Unique identifier" means a number or other identifier that
is assigned by a protocol established by the automated licensing system
approved by the commissioner.
(29) "Virtual currency kiosk operator" means a person that
engages in virtual currency business activity through a money transmission
kiosk located in this state or a person that owns, operates, or manages a
money transmission kiosk located in this state through which virtual currency
business activity is offered.
(30) "Virtual currency storage" means:
(A) maintaining possession, custody, or control over
virtual currency on behalf of another person, including as a virtual currency
control-services vendor;
(B) issuing, transferring, or otherwise granting or
providing to any person in this State any claim or right or any physical,
digital, or electronic instrument, receipt, certificate, or record
representing any claim or right to receive, redeem, withdraw, transfer,
exchange, or control any virtual currency or amount of virtual currency; or
(C) receiving possession, custody, or control over virtual
currency from a person in this State in return for a promise or obligation to
return, repay, exchange, or transfer such virtual currency or a like amount
of such virtual currency.
(31) "Virtual currency wallet" means a software application or
other mechanism providing a means for holding, storing, and transferring
virtual currency.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-55-202(b)(4), concerning the application
for a license under the Uniform Money Services Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) a list of the applicant's proposed authorized delegates and
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
the locations, including money transmission kiosks and virtual currency
kiosks, located in this State where the applicant and its authorized
delegates propose to engage in money transmission or provide other money
services;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-55-204 is amended to read as follows:
23-55-204. Surety bonds.
(a) An applicant for a money transmission license shall provide, and a
licensee at all times shall maintain, security consisting of a surety bond in
a form satisfactory to the Securities Commissioner.
(b)(1) The surety bond under subsection (a) shall be in a form
satisfactory to the Securities Commissioner and shall run to the State of
Arkansas for the benefit of any claimants against the licensee to secure the
faithful performance of the obligations of the licensee with respect to the
receipt, handling, transmission, and payment of money in connection with
money transmission.
(2) The commissioner has the discretion to require the applicant
to obtain additional security coverage to address related cybersecurity risks
inherent in the applicant's business model as it relates to virtual currency
transmission and to the extent the risks are not within the scope of the
required surety bond.
(c) The amount of the required security under this section shall be:
(1) the greater of $100,000 or an amount equal to 100 percent of
the licensee's average daily money transmission liability in this state,
calculated for the most recently completed three-month period, up to a
maximum of $500,000; or
(2) if the licensee's tangible net worth exceeds 10 percent of
total assets, then the licensee shall maintain a surety bond of $100,000.
(c)(d) A licensee that maintains a bond in the maximum amount provided
for in subsection (b) subsection (c), as applicable, is not required to
calculate its average daily money transmission liability in this state for
purposes of § 23-55-702.
(d)(e) A licensee may exceed the maximum required bond amount under §
23-55-702(a)(6).
(f)(1) A party having a claim against the licensee may bring suit
directly on the surety bond, or the commissioner may bring suit on behalf of
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
any claimants, either in one action or in successive actions.
(2) Consumer claims shall be given priority in recovering from
the surety bond.
(3) Every bond shall provide for suit on the surety bond by a
person who has a cause of action under this subchapter.
(g)(1) The surety bond shall remain in effect until cancellation,
which may occur only after sixty days' written notice to the commissioner.
(2) Cancellation shall not affect any liability incurred or
accrued during that period.
(h)(1) Except as provided by subdivision (h)(2), the surety bond shall
remain in place for no less than five (5) years after the licensee ceases
money transmission operations in this state.
(2) The commissioner may permit the surety bond to be reduced or
eliminated before that time to the extent that the amount of the licensee's
outstanding payment instruments, stored value obligations, and money
transmitted in this state is reduced.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-55-404(b), concerning the renewal of a
currency exchange license under the Uniform Money Services Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) A licensee under this article shall submit a renewal report with
the renewal fee, in a form and in a medium prescribed by the commissioner.
The renewal report must contain a list of the locations in this State where
the licensee or an authorized delegate of the licensee engages in currency
exchange, including limited stations, and mobile locations, money
transmission kiosks, and virtual currency kiosks.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-55-501(b), concerning a contract between
a licensee and an authorized delegate under the Uniform Money Services Act,
is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A contract between a licensee and an authorized delegate must
require the authorized delegate to operate in full compliance with this
chapter.
(2)(A) The licensee shall furnish in a record to each authorized
delegate policies and procedures sufficient for compliance with this chapter.
(B) The policies and procedures under subdivision
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(b)(2)(A) shall be updated on a reasonably periodic basis.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-55-501, concerning the relationship
between a licensee and an authorized delegate under the Uniform Money
Services Act, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(g) A copy of a contract required under this section shall be made
available to the Securities Commissioner, upon request.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 55, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-55-503. Training materials provided to authorized delegates.
(a) On or before April 1 of each year, a licensee shall provide to
each authorized delegate through which it engages in the business of money
transmission training materials on how to:
(1) recognize financial abuse and financial exploitation of an
elder adult; and
(2) respond appropriately if the authorized delegate suspects
that the authorized delegate is being asked to engage in the business of
money transmission for a fraudulent transaction in which an elder adult is
the victim of financial abuse or financial exploitation.
(b) A licensee shall provide the training materials required under
subsection (a) to each newly appointed authorized delegate within one month
after appointment of the authorized delegate.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 23-55-603(b), concerning a list of
authorized delegates required under the Uniform Money Services Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) A licensee shall file with the commissioner within 45 days after
the end of each calendar quarter a current list of all authorized delegates,
and locations in this State where the licensee or an authorized delegate of
the licensee provides money services, including limited stations, and mobile
locations, money transmission kiosks, and virtual currency kiosks. The
licensee shall state the name and street address of each location and
authorized delegate.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 23-55-608, concerning disclosure
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
requirements under the Uniform Money Services Act, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) Except as required by § 23-55-1008(a), a licensee or authorized
delegate shall include a clear, concise, and conspicuous fraud warning that
is posted in a conspicuous area or included on a transmittal form used by a
consumer to send money to another individual.
(2) The fraud warning required under subdivision (c)(1) shall:
(A) include a toll-free telephone number for consumers to
call to report fraud or suspected fraud; and
(B) be in clear, conspicuous, and legible writing in
English and in the language principally used by the licensee or authorized
delegate to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing,
for a transaction conducted in person, electronically, or by telephone, if
other than English.
(3) A licensee shall monitor the activities of its authorized
delegates relating to transmittals by consumers.
(4) If a licensee or authorized delegate conducts money
transmission activity through a website or a mobile application that is not
in a physical location, the commissioner may authorize an alternative form of
the fraud notice required under subdivision (c)(1).

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 55, Subchapter 10, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-55-1008. Virtual currency kiosk requirements.
(a)(1) The owner of a virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency
kiosk operator, in establishing a relationship with a customer and before
entering into an initial virtual currency transaction on behalf of or with
the customer, shall disclose in clear, conspicuous, and legible writing in
English and in the language principally used by the licensee or authorized
delegate to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing,
for a transaction conducted in person, electronically, or by phone, if other
than English, all material risks associated with virtual currency generally.
(2) The material risks associated with virtual currency required
to be disclosed under subdivision (a)(1) include without limitation:
(A) a disclosure that is acknowledged by the customer and
provided separately from the disclosures provided under subdivision (a)(2)(B)
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
and subdivision (a)(2)(G), and written prominently and in bold type, stating
the following:
“WARNING: LOSSES DUE TO FRAUDULENT OR ACCIDENTAL TRANSACTIONS MAY NOT BE
RECOVERABLE AND TRANSACTIONS IN VIRTUAL CURRENCY ARE IRREVERSIBLE.”;
(B) virtual currency is not backed or insured by the
government and accounts and value balances are not subject to protections of
the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, National Credit Union
Administration, or Securities Investor Protection Corporation;
(C) a virtual currency transaction may be deemed to be
made when recorded on a public ledger which may not be the date or time when
the customer initiates the virtual currency transaction;
(D) the value of virtual currency may be derived from the
continued willingness of market participants to exchange fiat currency for
virtual currency which may result in the permanent and total loss of the
value of a particular virtual currency if the market for that virtual
currency disappears;
(E) the volatility and unpredictability of the price of
virtual currency relative to fiat currency may result in a significant loss
over a short period of time;
(F) a bond maintained by the owner of a virtual currency
kiosk or a virtual currency kiosk operator for the benefit of the customers
of the owner of a virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency kiosk operator
may not be sufficient to cover all losses incurred by customers; and
(G)(i) virtual currency transactions are irreversible and
may be used by a person seeking to defraud customers.
(ii) As used in subdivision (a)(2)(G)(i), "seeking
to defraud customers" includes without limitation a person:
(a) impersonating a customer’s family or
friends;
(b) threatening jail time;
(c) stating that a customer’s identity has
been stolen;
(d) insisting that a customer withdraw money
from the customer’s bank account and purchase virtual currency; or
(e) alleging that a customer’s personal
computer has been hacked.
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(b)(1) An owner of a virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency
kiosk operator, when opening an account for a new customer and before
entering into an initial virtual currency transaction for, on behalf of, or
with the customer, shall disclose in clear, conspicuous, and legible writing
in English and in the language principally used by the licensee or authorized
delegate to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing,
for a transaction conducted in person, electronically, or by phone, if other
than English, using not less than twenty-four point sans-serif-type font, all
relevant terms and conditions associated with the products, services, and
activities of the owner of a virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency
kiosk operator and virtual currency generally.
(2) The disclosure required under subdivision (b)(1) shall
include without limitation:
(A) the customer’s liability for unauthorized virtual
currency transactions;
(B) the customer’s right to stop payment of a
preauthorized virtual currency transfer and the procedure used to initiate a
stop-payment order;
(C) the circumstances under which the owner of a virtual
currency kiosk or a virtual currency kiosk operator, absent a court or
government order, will disclose information concerning the customer’s account
to third parties;
(D) the requirement that the owner of a virtual currency
kiosk or a virtual currency kiosk operator communicate to the customer what
customer information may be disclosed to third parties;
(E) the customer’s right to receive a receipt for a
virtual currency transaction at the time of the transaction;
(F) upon a change in the rules or policies of the owner or
operator, the customer’s right to consent to the changed rules or policies
before performing a transaction after the change; and
(G) any other disclosures that are customarily provided in
connection with opening a person’s account.
(c)(1) An owner of a virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency
kiosk operator, before each transaction in virtual currency for, on behalf
of, or with a customer, shall disclose to the customer in an easily readable
manner that is in clear, conspicuous, and legible writing in English and in
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
the language principally used by the licensee or authorized delegate to
advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing, for a
transaction conducted in person, electronically, or by phone, if other than
English, using not less than twenty-four point sans-serif-type font, the
terms and conditions of the virtual currency transaction.
(2) The terms and conditions required under subdivision (c)(1)
shall include without limitation:
(A) the amount of the transaction;
(B) any fees, expenses, and charges borne by the customer,
including without limitation applicable exchange rates;
(C) the type and nature of the virtual currency
transaction;
(D) a warning that, once executed, the virtual currency
transaction may not be undone, if applicable;
(E) a daily virtual currency transaction limit according
to subsection (g);
(F) the difference in the sale price of the virtual
currency versus the current market price; and
(G) any other disclosures that are customarily given in
connection with a virtual currency transaction.
(d) An owner of a virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency kiosk
operator shall ensure that each customer acknowledges receipt of all
disclosures required under this section.
(e)(1) An owner of a virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency
kiosk operator, upon the completion of a virtual currency transaction, shall
provide to the customer a receipt containing:
(A) the name of, and contact information for, the owner of
the virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator, including
without limitation the owner of the virtual currency kiosk's or the virtual
currency kiosk operator’s business address and a customer service telephone
number established by the owner of a virtual currency kiosk or the virtual
currency kiosk operator to answer questions and register complaints;
(B) the name of the customer;
(C) the type, value, date and precise time of the virtual
currency transaction, transaction hash or identification number, and each
virtual currency address;
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(D) the amount of the virtual currency transaction
expressed in United States currency;
(E) the public virtual currency address of the customer;
(F) the unique identifier of the virtual currency kiosk
operator;
(G) a fee charged, including without limitation a fee
charged directly or indirectly by the owner of the virtual currency kiosk or
the virtual currency kiosk operator, or a third party involved in the virtual
currency transaction;
(H) the exchange rate, if applicable;
(I) any tax collected by the owner of the virtual currency
kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator for the virtual currency
transaction;
(J) a statement of the liability of the owner of the
virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator for nondelivery
or delayed delivery;
(K) a statement of the refund policy of the owner of the
virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator;
(L) the name and telephone number of the State Securities
Department and a statement disclosing that the owner of the virtual currency
kiosk's or the virtual currency kiosk operator’s customers may contact the
department with questions or complaints about the owner of the virtual
currency kiosk's or the virtual currency kiosk operator’s virtual currency
kiosk services; and
(M) any additional information the commissioner may
require.
(2) The receipt required under subdivision (e)(1):
(A) shall be provided in:
(i) a retainable form;
(ii) English; and
(iii) the language principally used by the owner of
the virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator to
advertise, solicit, or negotiate, orally or in writing; and
(B) may be provided electronically if the customer
requests or agrees to receive an electronic receipt.
(f) The total amount of a fee and commission charged by an owner of
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
the virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency kiosk operator for a virtual
currency transaction shall not exceed:
(1) five dollars; or
(2) eighteen percent of the amount of the virtual currency
transaction.
(g) There are established the following maximum daily virtual currency
kiosk transaction limits:
(1) two thousand dollars for each new customer of a virtual
currency kiosk; and
(2) seven thousand five hundred dollars for each existing
customer of a virtual currency kiosk.
(h) The owner of a virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency kiosk
operator shall allow a new customer, upon the request of the new customer, to
cancel and receive a full refund for any fraudulent virtual currency
transactions that occurred not later than seventy-two hours after the new
customer registered as a customer of the owner of the virtual currency kiosk
or the virtual currency kiosk operator if, not later than fourteen days after
the last virtual currency transaction that occurred during the seventy-two
hour period, the new customer:
(1) contacts the owner of the virtual currency kiosk or the
virtual currency kiosk operator and a government or law enforcement agency to
inform the owner of the virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk
operator and government or law enforcement agency of the fraudulent nature of
the virtual currency transaction; and
(2) files a report with a government or law enforcement agency
memorializing the fraudulent nature of the virtual currency transaction.
(i) Each owner of a virtual currency kiosk or a virtual currency kiosk
operator shall:
(1) obtain a copy of a government-issued identification card
that identifies each customer of the owner of the virtual currency kiosk or
the virtual currency kiosk operator;
(2) maintain restrictions that prevent more than one customer of
the owner of the virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk
operator from using the same virtual currency wallet;
(3) be able to prevent designated virtual currency wallets from
being used at a virtual currency kiosk owned or operated by the owner of the
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator;
(4) use an established third party that specializes in
performing blockchain analyses to preemptively perform the analyses to
identify and prevent high risk or sanctioned virtual currency wallets from
being used by customers at virtual currency kiosks owned or operated by the
owner of the virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator;
(5) define, in the owner of the virtual currency kiosk's or the
virtual currency kiosk operator’s policies and procedures, a risk-based
method of monitoring customers of the owner of the virtual currency kiosk or
the virtual currency kiosk operator on a post-transaction basis;
(6) offer, during the hours of operation of the virtual currency
kiosks owned or operated by the owner of the virtual currency kiosk or the
virtual currency kiosk operator, live customer support by telephone from a
telephone number prominently displayed at or on the virtual currency kiosks;
(7)(A) identify and speak by telephone with an elder adult who
is a new customer before the elder adult who is a new customer completes his
or her first virtual currency transaction with the owner of the virtual
currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator.
(B) During the communication, which shall be recorded and
retained by the owner of the virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency
kiosk operator, the owner of the virtual currency kiosk or the virtual
currency kiosk operator shall:
(i) reconfirm any attestations made by the new
customer at a virtual currency kiosk owned or operated by the owner of the
virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator;
(ii) discuss the transaction; and
(iii)(a) discuss types of fraudulent schemes
relating to virtual currency.
(b) The owner of the virtual currency kiosk's
or the virtual currency kiosk operator’s approval of the transaction shall be
dependent upon the owner of the virtual currency kiosk's or the virtual
currency kiosk operator’s assessment of the communication;
(8) designate and employ a chief compliance officer who shall:
(A) be qualified to coordinate and monitor a compliance
program to ensure compliance with this section and all other applicable
federal laws and regulations and state laws and rules; and
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(B) not own more than twenty percent of the owner of the
virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk operator that employs
the officer; and
(9) use full-time employees to fulfill the owner of the virtual
currency kiosk's or the virtual currency kiosk operator’s compliance
responsibilities under federal laws and regulations and state laws and rules.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 55, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Article 11 — Data Security for Money Services

23-55-1101. Definitions.
In this subchapter:
(1) "Authorized user" means an employee, contractor, agent, or
other person that participates in a financial institution’s business
operations and is authorized to access and use a financial institution’s
information systems and data.
(2) "Consumer” means an individual who obtains or has obtained a
financial product or service from a financial institution that is to be used
primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, or that individual's
legal representative.
(3) "Customer" means a consumer who has a customer relationship
with a financial institution.
(4) "Customer information" means a record containing nonpublic
personal information about a customer of a financial institution, whether in
paper, electronic, or other form, that is handled or maintained by or on
behalf of a financial institution or the financial institution’s affiliates.
(5) "Customer relationship" means a continuing relationship
between a consumer and a financial institution under which the financial
institution provides to the consumer one or more financial products or
services that are used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(6) "Encryption" means the transformation of data into a form
that results in a low probability of assigning meaning without the use of a
protective process or key, consistent with current cryptographic standards
and accompanied by appropriate safeguards for cryptographic key material.
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(7) "Financial institution" means a money services business
licensed under this chapter.
(8)(A) "Financial product or service" means a product or service
that a financial holding company could offer by engaging in a financial
activity under section 4(k) of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, 12
U.S.C. § 1843(k), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(B) "Financial product or service" includes a financial
institution’s evaluation or brokerage of information that a financial
institution collects in connection with a request or an application from a
consumer for a financial product or service.
(9) "Information security program" means the administrative,
technical, or physical safeguards a financial institution uses to access,
collect, distribute, process, protect, store, use, transmit, dispose of, or
otherwise handle customer information.
(10) "Information system" means a discrete set of electronic
information resources organized for the collection, processing, maintenance,
use, sharing, dissemination, or disposition of electronic information,
including any specialized system such as industrial controls systems or
process controls systems, telephone switching and private branch exchange
systems, and environmental controls systems, that contains customer
information or that is connected to a system that contains customer
information.
(11) "Multi-factor authentication" means authentication through
verification of at least two of the following types of authentication
factors:
(A) knowledge factors, including without limitation a
password;
(B) possession factors, including without limitation a
token; or
(C) inherence factors, including without limitation
biometric characteristics.
(12)(A) "Nonpublic personal information" means:
(i) personally identifiable financial information;
and
(ii) a list, description, or other grouping of
consumers, and publicly available information pertaining to a consumer, that
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
is derived using personally identifiable financial information that is not
publicly available.
(B) "Nonpublic personal information" includes without
limitation a list of individuals’ names and street addresses that is derived
in whole or in part using personally identifiable financial information that
is not publicly available.
(C) "Nonpublic personal information" does not include:
(i) publicly available information except as
included on a list described in subdivision (12)(A)(ii);
(ii) a list, description, or other grouping of
consumers, and publicly available information pertaining to the list,
description, or other grouping of consumers, that is derived without using
personally identifiable financial information that is not publicly available;
or
(iii) a list of individuals’ names and addresses
that contains only publicly available information and is not:
(a) derived, in whole or in part, using
personally identifiable financial information that is not publicly available;
and
(b) disclosed in a manner that indicates that
any of the individuals on the list is a consumer of a financial institution.
(13)(A) "Notification event" means acquisition of unencrypted
customer information without the authorization of an individual to which the
information pertains.
(B) For purposes of subdivision (13)(A):
(i) customer information is considered unencrypted
if the encryption key was accessed by an unauthorized person; and
(ii) unauthorized acquisition will be presumed to
include unauthorized access to unencrypted customer information unless a
financial institution has reliable evidence showing that there has not been,
or could not reasonably have been, unauthorized acquisition of the customer
information.
(14) "Penetration testing" means a test methodology in which
assessors attempt to circumvent or defeat the security features of an
information system by attempting penetration of databases or controls from
outside or inside a financial institution’s information systems.
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(15)(A) "Personally identifiable financial information" means
information:
(i) a consumer provides to a financial institution
to obtain a financial product or service from a financial institution;
(ii) about a consumer resulting from a transaction
involving a financial product or service between a financial institution and
a consumer; or
(iii) a financial institution otherwise obtains
about a consumer in connection with providing a financial product or service
to that consumer.
(B) "Personally identifiable financial information"
includes:
(i) information a consumer provides to a financial
institution on an application to obtain a loan, credit card, or other
financial product or service;
(ii) account balance information, payment history,
overdraft history, and credit or debit card purchase information;
(iii) the fact that an individual is or has been a
financial institutions’ customer or has obtained a financial product or
service from a financial institution;
(iv) information about a financial institution’s
consumer if the information is disclosed in a manner that indicates that the
individual is or has been the financial institution’s consumer;
(v) information that a consumer provides to a
financial institution or that a financial institution or a financial
institution’s agent otherwise obtains in connection with collecting on, or
servicing, a credit account;
(vi) information a financial institution collects
through an internet cookie or the information collecting device from a
computer server; and
(vii) information from a consumer report.
(C) "Personally identifiable financial information" does
not include:
(i) a list of names and addresses of customers of an
entity that is not a financial institution; and
(ii) information that does not identify a consumer,
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
including aggregate information or blind data that does not contain personal
identifiers such as account numbers, names, or addresses.
(16)(A) "Publicly available information" means information that
a financial institution has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made
available to the public from:
(i) federal, state, or local government records;
(ii) widely distributed media; or
(iii) disclosures to the public that are required to
be made by federal, state, or local law.
(B) "Publicly available information" includes without
limitation:
(i) information in government records, including
information in government real estate records and security interest filings;
and
(ii)(a) information from widely distributed media,
including information from a telephone book, a television or radio program, a
newspaper, or a website that is available to the public on an unrestricted
basis.
(b) A website is not restricted under
subdivision (16)(B)(ii)(a) merely because an Internet service provider or a
site operator requires a fee or a password, so long as access is available to
the public.
(C) For purposes of this subdivision (16), a financial
institution has a reasonable basis to believe that:
(i) information is lawfully made available to the
public if the financial institution has taken steps to determine:
(a) that the information is of the type that
is available to the public; and
(b) whether an individual can direct that the
information not be made available to the public and, if so, that the
financial institution’s consumer has not directed that the information not be
made available to the public;
(ii) mortgage information is lawfully made available
to the public if the financial institution determines that the information is
of the type included on the public record in the jurisdiction where the
mortgage would be recorded; and
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(iii) an individual’s telephone number is lawfully
made available to the public if the financial institution has located the
telephone number in a telephone directory or the consumer has informed the
financial institution that the telephone number is not unlisted.
(17) "Qualified individual" means an individual designated by a
financial institution to oversee, implement, and enforce the financial
institution’s information security program.
(18) "Security event" means an event resulting in unauthorized
access to, or disruption or misuse of:
(A) an information system or information stored on the
information system; or
(B) customer information held in physical form.
(19) "Service provider" means a person or entity that receives,
maintains, processes, or otherwise is permitted access to customer
information through its provision of services directly to a financial
institution that is subject to this subchapter.

23-55-1102. Standards for safeguarding customer information.
(a) A financial institution shall develop, implement, and maintain a
comprehensive information security program.
(b) The information security program under subsection (a) of this
section shall:
(1) be written in one or more readily accessible parts; and
(2) contain administrative, technical, and physical safeguards
that are appropriate to the financial institution’s size and complexity, the
nature and scope of the financial institution’s activities, and the
sensitivity of any customer information at issue.
(c) The information security program shall include the information
required under § 23-55-1103.

23-55-1103. Information security program required elements.
(a) In order for a financial institution to develop, implement, and
maintain an information security program, the financial institution shall
comply with this section.
(b)(1) A financial institution shall designate a qualified individual
responsible for overseeing and implementing the financial institution’s
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
information security program and enforcing an information security program.
(2)(A) The qualified individual may be employed by the financial
institution, an affiliate, or a service provider.
(B) If a financial institution designates an individual
employed by an affiliate or service provider, the financial institution
shall:
(i) retain responsibility for compliance with this
section;
(ii) designate a senior member of the financial
institution’s personnel to be responsible for direction and oversight of the
qualified individual; and
(iii) require the service provider or affiliate to
maintain an information security program that protects the financial
institution in accordance with the requirements of this section.
(c)(1) A financial institution shall base the financial institution’s
information security program on a risk assessment that:
(A) identifies reasonably foreseeable internal and
external risks to the security, confidentiality, and integrity of customer
information that could result in the unauthorized disclosure, misuse,
alteration, destruction, or other compromise of the information; and
(B) assesses the sufficiency of any safeguards in place to
control these risks.
(2) The risk assessment shall be written and include:
(A) criteria for the evaluation and categorization of
identified security risks or threats the financial institution faces;
(B) criteria for the assessment of the confidentiality,
integrity, and availability of the financial institution’s information
systems and customer information, including the adequacy of the existing
controls in the context of the identified risks or threats the financial
institution faces; and
(C) requirements describing how identified risks will be
mitigated or accepted based on the risk assessment and how the information
security program will address the risks.
(3) A financial institution shall periodically perform
additional risk assessments that:
(A) reexamine the reasonably foreseeable internal and
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
external risks to the security, confidentiality, and integrity of customer
information that could result in the unauthorized disclosure, misuse,
alteration, destruction, or other compromise of customer information; and
(B) reassess the sufficiency of any safeguards in place to
control these risks.
(d) A financial institution shall design and implement safeguards to
control the risks the financial institution identifies through the risk
assessment as required under subsection (c), including without limitation:
(1) implementing and periodically reviewing access controls,
including technical and, as appropriate, physical controls, to:
(A) authenticate and permit access only to authorized
users to protect against the unauthorized acquisition of customer
information; and
(B) limit authorized users’ access only to customer
information that the authorized user needs to perform the authorized user’s
duties and functions, or in the case of customers, to access the customer’s
own customer information;
(2) identifying and managing the data, personnel, devices,
systems, and facilities that enable the financial institution to achieve
business purposes according to the financial institution's relative
importance to business objectives and the financial institution’s risk
strategy;
(3)(A) protecting by encryption all customer information held or
transmitted by the financial institution both in transit over external
networks and at rest.
(B) to the extent the financial institution determines
that encryption of customer information, either in transit over external
networks or at rest, is infeasible, the financial institution may instead
secure the customer information using effective alternative compensating
controls reviewed and approved by the financial institution’s qualified
individual;
(4) adopting secure development practices for in-house developed
applications utilized by the financial institution for transmitting,
accessing, or storing customer information and procedures for evaluating,
assessing, or testing the security of externally developed applications the
financial institution utilizes to transmit, access, or store customer
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
information;
(5) implementing multi-factor authentication for an individual
accessing an information system, unless the financial institution’s qualified
individual has approved in writing the use of reasonably equivalent or more
secure access controls;
(6) developing, implementing, and maintaining procedures for the
secure disposal of customer information in any format no later than two years
after the last date the customer information is used in connection with the
provision of a financial product or service to the customer, unless the
customer information is:
(A) necessary for business operations or for other
legitimate business purposes;
(B) otherwise required to be retained by state law or
rule, or federal law or regulation; or
(C) where targeted disposal is not reasonably feasible due
to the manner in which the information is maintained;
(7) periodically reviewing the financial institution’s data
retention policy to minimize the unnecessary retention of data;
(8) adopting procedures for change management; and
(9) implementing policies, procedures and controls designed to
monitor and log the activity of authorized users and detect unauthorized
access or use of, or tampering with, customer information by these users.
(e)(1) A financial institution shall regularly test or otherwise
monitor the effectiveness of the safeguards' key controls, systems, and
procedures of the safeguards required under this section, including those to
detect actual and attempted attacks on or intrusions into information
systems.
(2)(A) For information systems, monitoring and testing shall
include continuous monitoring or periodic penetration testing and
vulnerability assessments.
(B) Absent effective continuous monitoring or other
systems to detect, on an ongoing basis, changes in information systems that
may create vulnerabilities, the financial institution shall conduct:
(i) annual penetration testing of a financial
institution’s information systems determined each given year based on
relevant identified risks according to the risk assessment; and
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(ii) vulnerability assessments, including a systemic
scan or review of an information system reasonably designed to identify
publicly known security vulnerabilities in the financial institution’s
information systems based on the risk assessment, at least every six months,
and whenever there are:
(a) material changes to the financial
institution’s operations or business arrangements; and
(b) circumstances the financial institution
knows or has reason to know may have a material impact on the financial
institution’s information security program.
(f) A financial institution shall implement policies and procedures to
ensure that personnel are able to enact the financial institution’s
information security program by:
(1) providing the financial institution’s personnel with
security awareness training that is updated as necessary to reflect risks
identified by the risk assessment;
(2) utilizing qualified information security personnel employed
by the financial institution or an affiliate or service provider sufficient
to manage the financial institution’s information security risks and to
perform or oversee the information security program;
(3) providing information security personnel with security
updates and training sufficient to address relevant security risks; and
(4) verifying that key information security personnel take steps
to maintain current knowledge of changing information security threats and
countermeasures.
(g) A financial institution shall oversee service providers by:
(1) taking reasonable steps to select and retain service
providers that are capable of maintaining appropriate safeguards for the
customer information at issue;
(2) requiring the financial institution’s service providers by
contract to implement and maintain the safeguards referenced under
subdivision (g)(1); and
(3) periodically assessing the financial institution’s service
providers based on the risk they present and the continued adequacy of their
safeguards.
(h) A financial institution shall evaluate and adjust the financial
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
institution’s information security program to reflect:
(1) the results of the testing and monitoring required by
subsection (e);
(2) upon any material change to the financial institution’s
operations or business arrangements or other circumstances;
(3) the results of risk assessments performed under subdivision
(c)(3); and
(4) any other circumstances that the financial institution knows
or has reason to know may have a material impact on the financial
institution's information security program.
(i)(1) A financial institution shall establish a written incident
response plan designed to promptly respond to, and recover from, any security
event materially affecting the confidentiality, integrity, or availability of
customer information in the financial institution’s control.
(2) The incident response plan under subdivision (i)(1) shall
address:
(A) the goals of the incident response plan;
(B) the internal processes for responding to a security
event;
(C) the definition of clear roles, responsibilities, and
levels of decision-making authority;
(D) external and internal communications and information
sharing;
(E) identification of requirements for the remediation of
any identified weaknesses in information systems and associated controls;
(F) documentation and reporting regarding security events
and related incident response activities; and
(G) the evaluation and revision as necessary of the
incident response plan following a security event.
(j)(1) The financial institution’s qualified individual shall report
in writing at least annually, to the financial institution’s board of
directors or equivalent governing body.
(2) If a board of directors or equivalent governing body does
not exist, the report required under subdivision (j)(1) shall be timely
presented to a senior officer responsible for the financial institution’s
information security program.
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
(3) The report required under subdivision (j)(1) shall include:
(A) the overall status of the information security program
and the financial institution’s compliance with this section and associated
rules; and
(B) material matters related to the information security
program, addressing issues such as risk assessment, risk management and
control decisions, service provider arrangements, results of testing,
security events or violations and management’s responses to security events
or violations, and recommendations for changes in the information security
program.
(k) A financial institution shall provide notice to the Securities
Commissioner about notification events according to subdivisions (l)(1) and
(2).
(l)(1) Upon discovery of a notification event as described in
subdivision (l)(2), if the notification event involves the information of any
consumers in this state, the financial institution shall notify the
commissioner as soon as possible, and no later than forty-five days after
discovery of the notification event.
(2) The notice required under subdivision (l)(1) shall:
(A) be made in a format specified by the commissioner; and
(B) include the following information:
(i) the name and contact information of the
reporting financial institution;
(ii)(a) a description of the types of information
that were involved in the notification event.
(b) if the information is possible to
determine under subdivision (l)(2)(B)(ii)(a), the notice required under
subdivision (l)(1) shall contain the date or date range of the notification
event;
(iii) the number of consumers affected or
potentially affected by the notification event;
(iv) a general description of the notification
event; and
(v)(a) whether a law enforcement official has
provided the financial institution with a written determination that
notifying the public of the notification event would impede a criminal
03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1467
investigation or cause damage to national security, and a means for the
commissioner to contact the law enforcement official.
(b) A law enforcement official under
subdivision (l)(2)(B)(v)(a) may request an initial delay of up to thirty days
following the date when notice was provided to the commissioner.
(c) The delay under subdivision
(l)(2)(B)(v)(b) may be extended for an additional period of up to sixty days
if the law enforcement official seeks an extension in writing.
(d) An additional delay beyond the delay under
subdivision (l)(2)(B)(v)(b) may be permitted only if the State Securities
Department determines that public disclosure of a notification event
continues to impede a criminal investigation or cause damage to national
security.
(3)(A) A notification event under this section shall be treated
as discovered as of the first day on which the notification event is known to
the financial institution.
(B) The financial institution under subdivision (l)(3)(A)
shall be deemed to have knowledge of a notification event if the notification
event is known to a person, other than the person committing the notification
event, who is the financial institution’s employee, officer, or other agent.
(m) A financial institution shall establish a written plan addressing
business continuity and disaster recovery.

23-55-1104. Exceptions.
This article does not apply to a financial institution that maintains
customer information concerning fewer than five thousand consumers.

/s/Achor








03-17-2025 11:43:58 ANS122